Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 6 Jurisdiction

53-5-50.
Original jurisdiction; petition and pleading requirements.

The probate court shall have original jurisdiction over any petition to vacate, set aside, or amend its order admitting a will to probate.

A petition under subsection (a) of this Code section may be brought in the probate court to vacate, set aside, or amend its order admitting a will to probate based upon:

Another will being entitled to be admitted to probate;

A codicil to the probated will being entitled to be admitted to probate;

Lack of jurisdiction;

Fraud, accident, or mistake or the acts of the adverse party unmixed with the negligence or fault of the petitioner; or

A nonamendable defect that appears upon the face of the record or pleadings.

Any such petition based upon paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be combined with a petition to probate the other will in solemn form.

Any such petition based upon paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be combined with a petition to probate the codicil in solemn form.

In any such petition based upon paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section, the court shall consider the petition to probate in solemn form together with the petition to vacate, set aside, or amend; and the court shall grant relief as is appropriate with respect to each matter.

In any such petition based upon paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of this Code section, it is not sufficient that the pleadings fail to state a claim upon which relief can be granted, but the pleadings must affirmatively show no claim in fact existed.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-26/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote this Code section, which read: “(a) The probate court shall have original jurisdiction over any action to vacate, set aside, or amend its order admitting a will to probate which alleges:

“(1) That another will is entitled to be admitted to probate; or

“(2) That a codicil to the probated will is entitled to be admitted to probate

“(b)
Any such action shall be combined with a petition to probate in solemn form the other will or codicil. The court shall consider the petition to probate together with the action to vacate, set aside, or amend; and the court shall grant relief as is appropriate with respect to each matter.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 327 (2019).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-5-51.
Contents of petition; service of notice; issuance of relief.

A petition made pursuant to Code Section 53-5-50 shall set forth the allegations on which such petition is based and the name and address of the then acting personal representative, if any, of the estate, or, if none, the beneficiaries of the previously probated will required to be served by Code Section 53-5-22. Such petition shall conclude with a prayer for the issuance of an order vacating, setting aside, or amending the earlier probate and, if such petition is based upon paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 53-5-50, for the probate of the newly propounded will or codicil in solemn form and for the issuance of new letters testamentary.

The beneficiaries under the previously probated will shall be represented in the action by the then acting personal representative, if any; and service of notice upon the personal representative in the same manner as provided for by law under Chapter 11 of this title shall be the equivalent of service of notice upon the beneficiaries.

If there is no then acting personal representative, such petition and the citation issued thereon shall be served upon the beneficiaries who are required to be served by Code Section 53-5-22 of the previously probated will, in the same manner as upon the heirs, unless all such parties assent to such petition.

If the then acting personal representative acknowledges service of such petition and notice and assents to the relief in the acknowledgment of service of such petition and notice, the relief prayed for in such petition may issue without delay. In the event there is no then acting personal representative, if all the beneficiaries acknowledge service of such petition and notice and assent in their acknowledgments, such relief may issue without delay.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-27/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “A petition” for “The petition” and “such petition” for “the action”, and, in the second sentence, substituted “Such petition” for “The petition” at the beginning, substituted “probate and, if such petition is based upon paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 53-5-50, for” for “probate;”, substituted “newly propounded will” for “new will”, and substituted “form and for” for “form; and”; inserted “of notice” preceding “upon the beneficiaries” at the end of subsection (b); in subsection (c), substituted “such petition and the citation issued thereon” for “the petition” near the beginning, and substituted “such petition” for “the petition” at the end;
and, in subsection “(d), in the first sentence, substituted “such petition and notice and” for “the petition and”
and substituted “of such petition and notice, the relief prayed for in such petition” for “the relief upon the petition”, and, in the second sentence, substituted “such petition and notice and assent in their acknowledgments, such relief” for “the petition and assent in their acknowledgments, the relief”.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 327 (2019).

53-5-52.
Time limitation; filing of petition constitutes claim against estate.

A petition based upon paragraph (1) or (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 53-5-50 shall be brought before:

The probate of the previously probated will becomes conclusive upon the petitioner under Code Section 53-5-19 or 53-5-20; and

The expiration of the time within which the newly propounded will must be offered for probate under Code Section 53-5-3.

A petition based upon paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Code Section 53-5-50 may be brought at any time.

In all other instances, a petition made pursuant to this article shall be brought within three years from entry of the order admitting a will to probate.

The filing of a petition made pursuant to this article shall constitute a claim against a decedent’s estate that arose before the death of the decedent for purposes of Code Section 9-3-36.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-28/HB 865.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-5-53.
Applicability of article.

The provisions of this article shall govern in proceedings in the probate court to vacate, set aside, or amend an order admitting a will to probate, and the provisions of Code Section 9-11-60 shall not be applicable to such proceedings.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-28/HB 865.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.